West Virginia, session 2025, SB334.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. Authorization for the office of inspector general to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5B-1. Office of Inspector General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §27-9-1 of this code, modified by the Office of Inspector General to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 26, 2024, relating to the Office of Inspector General (Behavioral Health Centers Licensure, 71 CSR 25), is authorized.